tables/fr-bfu-g2.ctb
word regard		1235-1245
word regards		1235-1245-234
word regret		1235-12456
word regrets		1235-12456-234
word regrettable	1235-12456-45
word regrettables	1235-12456-45-234
word regrettablement	1235-12456-45-134
word relatif		1235-2345-124
word relatifs		1235-2345-124-234
word relation		1235-2345
word relations		1235-2345-234
word relative		1235-2345-1236
word relatives		1235-2345-1236-234
word relativement	1235-2345-1236-134
word relativité		1235-2345-1236-2345
word relativités	1235-2345-1236-2345-234
word remarquable	1235-12345-45
word remarquables	1235-12345-45-234
word remarquablement	1235-12345-45-134
word remarque		1235-12345
word remarques		1235-12345-234
word remerciement	1235-134
word remerciements	1235-134-234
word renseignement	1235-26
word renseignements	1235-26-234
word rêve		1235-126
word rêves		1235-126-234
word rêveur		1235-126-46
word rêveurs		1235-126-46-234
word rêveuse		1235-126-234-15
word rêveuses		1235-126-234-156
word rêveusement	1235-126-234-134
word riz 56-1235-24-1356
word riez 1235-24-1356
word rôle		1235-1456
word rôles		1235-1456-234
noback prfword route		1235-1256
noback prfword routes		1235-1256-234
nofor word route		1235-1256
nofor word routes		1235-1256-234
nofor word autoroute		13-2345-135-1235-1256
nofor word autoroutes		13-2345-135-1235-1256-234
nofor word banqueroute		12-2-12345-15-1235-1256
nofor word banqueroutes		12-2-12345-15-1235-1256-234
nofor word biroute		12-24-1235-1256
nofor word biroutes		12-24-1235-1256-234
nofor word déroute		145-123456-1235-1256
nofor word déroutes		145-123456-1235-1256-234
nofor word inforoute 35-124-135-1235-1256
nofor word inforoutes 35-124-135-1235-1256-234
nofor word maroute		134-1-1235-1256
nofor word maroutes		134-1-1235-1256-234
nofor word radioroute 1235-1-145-24-135-1235-1256
nofor word radioroutes 1235-1-145-24-135-1235-1256-234
nofor word restoroute 3-234-2345-135-1235-1256
nofor word restoroutes 3-234-2345-135-1235-1256-234
nofor word restauroute 3-234-2345-13-1235-1256
nofor word restauroutes 3-234-2345-135-123-1256-234

word rythme		1235-13456
word rythmes		1235-13456-234
word rythmique		1235-13456-12345
word rythmiques		1235-13456-12345-234
word rythmiquement	1235-13456-12345-134

word séculaire		234-14-1235
word séculaires		234-14-1235-234
word séculairement	234-14-1235-134
word seigneur		234-2356
word seigneurs		234-2356-234
prfword semblable		234-12
prfword semblables		234-12-234
word sb 56-234-12
prfword semblablement	234-12-134
noback prfword sentiment		234-2345-134
noback prfword sentiments		234-2345-134-234
nofor word sentiment		234-2345-134
nofor word sentiments		234-2345-134-234
nofor word dissentiment		256-234-2345-134
nofor word dissentiments		256-234-2345-134-234
nofor word pressentiment		235-15-234-234-2345-134
nofor word pressentiments		235-15-234-234-2345-134-234
nofor word ressentiment		1235-15-234-234-2345-134
nofor word ressentiments		1235-15-234-234-2345-134-234

word sentimental	234-2345-134-123
word sentimentale	234-2345-134-123-15
word sentimentales	234-2345-134-123-156
word sentimentalement	234-2345-134-123-134
word sentimentalité	234-2345-134-123-2345
word sentimentalités	234-2345-134-123-2345-234
word sentimentaux	234-2345-134-1346
word ses		234-234
word seul		234-123
word seuls		234-123-234
word seule		234-123-15
word seules		234-123-156
word seulement		234-123-134
word siècle		234-14
word siècles		234-14-234
word sc 56-234-14
word simple		234-1246
word simples		234-1246-234
word simplement		234-1246-134
word simplicité		234-1246-2345
word simplicités	234-1246-2345-234
word simplification	234-1246-16
word simplifications	234-1246-16-234
noback prfword soeur		234-1235
noback prfword soeurs		234-1235-234
prfword sœur		234-1235
prfword sœurs		234-1235-234
word sr 56-234-1235
word soin		234-35
word soins		234-35-234
word solitaire		234-123-1235
word solitaires		234-123-1235-234
word solitairement	234-123-1235-134
word solitude		234-123-145
word solitudes		234-123-145-234
word sommaire		234-2456-1235
word sommaires		234-2456-1235-234
word sommairement	234-2456-1235-134
word somme		234-2456
word sommes		234-2456-234
word sont		246-2345
word sorte		234-135
word sortes		234-135-234
word soudain		234-145
word soudains		234-145-234
word soudaine		234-1345
word soudaines		234-1345-234
word sn 56-234-1345
word soudainement	234-1345-134
word soudaineté		234-1345-2345
word soudainetés	234-1345-2345-234
word souffrance		234-124-14
word souffrances	234-124-14-234
word souffrant		234-124
contraction sf	234-124
word souffrants		234-124-234
word souffrante		234-124-15
word souffrantes	234-124-156
word souvent		234-1236
contraction sv 234-1236
word subjectif		234-245-124
word subjectifs		234-245-124-234
word subjective		234-245-1236
word subjectives	234-245-1236-234
word subjectivement	234-245-1236-134
word subjectivité	234-245-1236-2345
word subjectivités	234-245-1236-2345-234
word sujet		234-245
word sujets		234-245-234
word sujétion		234-245-3456
word sujétions		234-245-3456-234
word supérieur		234-1234
word supérieurs		234-1234-234
word supérieure		234-1234-15
word supérieures	234-1234-156
word supérieurement	234-1234-134
word supériorité	234-1234-2345
word supériorités	234-1234-2345-234
word surtout		234-2345
contraction st	234-2345
word systématique	234-13456-12345
word systématiques	234-13456-12345-234
word systématiquement	234-13456-12345-134
word système		234-13456
word systèmes		234-13456-234

word tel		2345-123
word tels		2345-123-234
word telle		2345-123-123
word telles		2345-123-123-234
word tellement		2345-123-134
word temporaire		2345-1234-1235
word temporaires	2345-1234-1235-234
word temporairement	2345-1234-1235-134
prfword temporel		2345-1234-123
prfword temporels		2345-1234-123-234
prfword temporelle		2345-1234-123-123
prfword temporelles	2345-1234-123-123-234
word temps		2345-1234
prfword tenir		2345-1345
word terre		2345-1235
word terres		2345-1235-234
contraction tr 2345-1235
word tes		2345-234
word tête		2345-126
word têtes		2345-126-234
word théorie		2345-125
word théories		2345-125-234
word théorique		2345-125-12345
word théoriques		2345-125-12345-234
word théoriquement	2345-125-12345-134
word titre		2345-356
word titres		2345-356-234
word toujours		2345-245
word toute		2345-2345
word toutes		2345-2345-234
word toutefois		2345-124
word tragique		356-1245
word tragiques		356-1245-234
word tragiquement	356-1245-134
word trajet		356-245
word trajets		356-245-234
prfword tranquille		356-12345
prfword tranquilles	356-12345-234
prfword tranquillement	356-12345-134
prfword tranquillité	356-12345-2345
prfword tranquillités	356-12345-2345-234
word travail		356-123
word travailleur	356-123-46
word travailleurs	356-123-46-234
word travailleuse	356-123-234-15
word travailleuses	356-123-234-156
word travaux		356-1346
word travers		356-1236
word très		356-234
word trop		356-1234
word type		2345-13456
word types		2345-13456-234
word typique		2345-13456-12345
word typiques		2345-13456-12345-234
word typiquement	2345-13456-12345-134

word ufo 136-124-135
word ufr 136-124-1235
word uht 136-125-2345
word une		136-1345
word unes		136-1345-234
word unique		136-12345
word uniques		136-12345-234
word uniquement		136-12345-134
word unitaire		136-1345-2345-1235
word unitaires		136-1345-2345-1235-234
word unité		136-1345-2345
word unités		136-1345-2345-234
word univers		136-1236
contraction uv 136-1236
word universalité	136-1236-123-2345
word universalités	136-1236-123-2345-234
word universel		136-1236-123
word universels		136-1236-123-234
word universelle	136-1236-123-123
word universelles	136-1236-123-123-234
word universellement	136-1236-123-134
word universitaire	136-1236-2345-1235
word universitaires	136-1236-2345-1235-234
word université		136-1236-2345
word universités	136-1236-2345-234
contraction url 136-1235-123
contraction us 136-234
word usage		136-1245
word usages		136-1245-234
word usb 136-234-12
word utile		136-123
word utiles		136-123-234
word utilement		136-123-134
word inutile		35-136-123
word inutiles		35-136-123-234
word inutilement		35-136-123-134
contraction ulm 136-123-134
noback prfword utilisable		136-123-45
noback prfword utilisables	136-123-45-234
nofor word utilisable		136-123-45
nofor word utilisables	136-123-45-234
nofor word inutilisable		35-136-123-45
nofor word inutilisables	35-136-123-45-234
nofor word réutilisable		1235-123456-136-123-45
nofor word réutilisables	1235-123456-136-123-45-234

word utilisateur	136-123-46
word utilisateurs	136-123-46-234
word utilisation	136-123-16
word utilisations	136-123-16-234
word inutilisation	35-136-123-16
word inutilisations	35-136-123-16-234
word utilitaire		136-123-2345-1235
word utilitaires	136-123-2345-1235-234
noback prfword utilité		136-123-2345
noback prfword utilités		136-123-2345-234
nofor word désutilité 145-123456-234-136-123-2345
nofor word désutilités 145-123456-234-136-123-2345-234
nofor word futilité 124-136-123-2345
nofor word futilités 124-136-123-2345-234
nofor word utilité 136-123-2345
nofor word utilités 136-123-2345-234
nofor word inutilité 35-136-123-2345
nofor word inutilités 35-136-123-2345-234

word utm 56-136-2345-134

word valeur		1236-46
word valeurs		1236-46-234
word vau 1236-13
nofor endword vau 1236-13
prfword venir		1236-1345
word véritable		1236-1235
word véritables		1236-1235-234
word véritablement	1236-1235-134
word vérité		1236-123456
word vérités		1236-123456-234
contraction vé 1236-123456
word vieux		1236-1346
word vif		1236-124
word vifs		1236-124-234
contraction vf 1236-124
word vive		1236-1236
word vives		1236-1236-234
word vivement		1236-1236-134
word voici		1236-14
word voilà		1236-123
word revoilà		3-1236-123
word volontaire		1236-135-1235
word volontaires	1236-135-1235-234
word volontairement	1236-135-1235-134
word volonté		1236-135
word volontés		1236-135-234
contraction vo 1236-135
word volontiers		1236-346
word von 1236-135-1345
word vos		1236-234
contraction vs 1236-234
word votre		1236-356
word vôtre		1236-1456
word vôtres		1236-1456-234
word voyage		1236-1245
word voyages		1236-1245-234
word voyageur		1236-1245-46
word voyageurs		1236-1245-46-234
word voyageuse		1236-1245-234-15
word voyageuses		1236-1245-234-156
word vraiment		1236-134
word xml 1346-134-123
nofor word hymen 125-13456-134-26

###
### 4. Locutions
###

word à\scause 12356-456-14
word à\smesure 12356-456-134
word à\speine 12356-456-1234
word à\speu\sprès 12356-456-1234-456-235
word à\sprésent 12356-456-235
word à\stravers 12356-456-356
word au\scontraire 13-456-14
word au-dessous 13-36-1256
word au-dessus 13-36-145
word aujourd'hui 13-3-125
word autant\sque 13-456-12345
word autre\schose 13-456-12356
word autre\spart 13-456-1234
word c'est-à-dire 14-3-15-36-12356-36-145
word d'abord 145-3-1
word de\ssuite 145-456-234
word en\smesure 26-456-134
word en\sréalité 26-456-1235
word et\scaetera 15-456-14
word la\splupart 123-456-1246
word non\sseulement 1345-456-234
word parce\sque 1234-456-12345
word par\sconséquent 1234-456-14
word par-dessous 1234-36-1256
word par-dessus 1234-36-145
word par\sexemple 1234-456-15
word par\ssuite 1234-456-234
word peu\sà\speu 1234-456-12356-456-1234
word peut-être 1234-36-126
word plus\stard 1246-456-2345
word plus\stôt 1246-456-1456
word pour\sainsi\sdire 1234-456-1-456-145
word quelque\schose 12345-456-12356
word quelque\spart 12345-456-1234
word quelque\stemps 12345-456-2345
word sans\scesse 234-456-14
word sans\sdoute 234-456-145
word tandis\sque 2345-456-12345
word tour\sà\stour 2345-456-12356-456-2345
word tout\sà\scoup 16-456-12356-456-14
word tout\sà\sfait 16-456-12356-456-124
word très\sbien 356-456-12
word vis-à-vis 1236-36-12356-36-1236

before apost sufword autant\squ 13-456-12345
before apost sufword jusqu 245-12345
before apost sufword lorsqu 123-12345
before apost sufword parce\squ 1234-456-12345
before apost sufword presqu 235-12345
before apost sufword puisqu 1234-12345
before apost sufword tandis\squ 2345-456-12345
